Missouri, session 2026, SB1660.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 173.068, to read as
follows:
173.068. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Disabled applicant", an individual with a
documented lifelong disability or static disability;
(2) "Lifelong disability", an underlying
neurodevelopmental or medical condition that persists across
the individual's lifespan. Such conditions are
nonprogressive in nature, though symptoms may be mitigated
or managed through appropriate interventions. Lifelong
disabilities include, but are not limited to, specific
learning disabilities such as dyslexia, attention-
deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), and autism spectrum
disorder (ASD);
(3) "Public institution of higher education", a
community college, state college, or state university
located in Missouri that receives state moneys;

SB 1660 2
(4) "Standardized applicant examination", includes,
but is not limited to, the following:
(a) Advanced Placement (AP) exams;
(b) American College Testing program examination (ACT);
(c) Classic Learning Test (CLT);
(d) Graduate Management Admission Test (GMAT);
(e) Law School Admission Test (LSAT);
(f) Medical College Admission Test (MCAT);
(g) Preliminary Scholastic Aptitude Test/National
Merit Scholarship Qualifying Test (PSAT/NMSQT); and
(h) Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT);
(5) "Static disability", a nonprogressive condition in
which the underlying impairment and its inherent severity
remain stable over time. A static disability is
characterized by a fixed level of functional limitation that
does not substantially improve, deteriorate, or change in
nature, even though the individual's performance, skills, or
adaptive strategies may develop through intervention or
experience.
2. For the 2027-28 academic year and all subsequent
academic years, a public institution of higher education
shall not accept standardized applicant examination scores
from an entity that requires a disabled applicant to have
taken a comprehensive test for a documented disability
within the two years before the date of the standardized
applicant examination in order for the disabled applicant to
receive allowed accommodations under:
(1) The federal Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as
amended;
(2) Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of
1973, 29 U.S.C. Section 794, as amended; or

SB 1660 3
(3) The federal Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA),
42 U.S.C. Section 12101, et seq., as amended.
✓